enhuige.foma
### enhu2.foma ###

# Vowels
define Vowel [ a | á | e | é | i | í | o |ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő | A | Á | E | É | I | Í | O | Ó | U | Ú | Ü | Ű | Ö | Ő ];
define ConsNogln [ b | c | d | f | h | j | k | m | p | q | r | s | v | w | x | y | z | B | C | D | E | F | H | J | K | L | M | P | Q | R | S | V | W | X | Y | Z ];
define Cons [ b | c | č | ć | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z | B | C | D | E | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | P | Q | R | S | T | V | W | X | Y | Z ];
define Consk [ b | c | č | ć | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z | B | C | D | E | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | P | Q | R | S | T | V | W | X | Y | Z | %- ];
define Consnosz [ b | c | č | ć | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | t | v | w | x | y | B | C | D | E | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | P | Q | R | T | V | W | X | Y ];
define Consnoszk [ b | c | č | ć | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | t | v | w | x | y | B | C | D | E | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | P | Q | R | T | V | W | X | Y | %- ];
define Consnoszgm [ b | c | č | ć | d | f | h | j | k | l | n | p | q | r | t | v | w | x | y | B | C | D | E | F | H | J | K | L | N | P | Q | R | T | V | W | X | Y ];
define Consgat [ d | g | n | r | s | t | v | D | G | N | R | S | T | V ];
define Consgat1 [ d | g | g y | k | n | p | r | s | t | t y | v | D | G | G Y | K | N | P | R | S | T | T Y | V ];
define Consgat2 [ d | f | g | g y | k | n | p | r | s | t | t y | v | D | F | G | G Y | K | N | P | R | S | T | T Y | V ];
define Conssz [ s | z | s z | S | Z | S Z ];
define Consjlnr [ j | l | n | r | J | L | N | R ];
define Constnelkul [ b | d | f | g | k | p | v | Cons t | B | D | F | G | K | P | V | Cons T ];
define yNoCons [ ConsNogln y | Vowel y | s z t y ];
define yNoConstny [ Cons y | Vowel y ];
define Vowelwithy [ Vowel | yNoCons ];
define Vowelwithytny [ Vowel | yNoConstny ];
define Vowel1 [ a | e | í | o | ü | ö | A | E | Í | O | Ü | Ö ]; # w/o  á, é, i, ó, ő, ű, u, ú
define Vowel1exc [ á | é | i | ó | ő | ű | u | ú | Á | É | I | Ó | Ő | Ű | U | Ú ];
define Vowel1withy [ Vowel1 | yNoCons ];
define BackVowel [ a | á | o | ó | u | ú | A | Á | O | Ó | U | Ú ];
define FrontUnroundedVowel [ e | é | i | í | ü | ű | E | É | I | Í | Ü | Ű ];
define Front1UnroundedVowel [ e | é | i | í | E | É | I | Í  ];
define FrontRoundedVowel [ ö | ő | Ö | Ő ];
define Front1RoundedVowel [ ö | ő | ü | ű | Ö | Ő | Ü | Ű ];
define FrontVowel [ e | é | i | í | ü | ű | ö | ő | E | É | I | Í | Ü | Ű | Ö | Ő ];
define PlosivCons [ b | d | g | h | j | p | t | B | D | G | H | J | P | T ];
define NonPlosivCons [ c | j | l | r | s | v | z | C | J | L | R | S | V | Z ];
define OppNonPlosivCons [ b | d | f | g | h | k | m | n | p | q | t | w | x | y | B | D | F | G | H | K | M | N | P | Q | T | W | X | Y ];


define Filter1 ~[ $[ %+Rep \[%+Imper]* %+Rep ] |  $[ %+Imper \[%+Rep]* %+Imper ] ]; 
define HarmRulenook §igeoo§ -> ó // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                   §igeoo§ -> ő // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRulenookmely §igeoomely§ -> ó // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                   §igeoomely§ -> ó // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleAAA §AAA§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                   §AAA§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;

define HarmRuleAA §AA§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                  §AA§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
 
define HarmRuleIgeo §igeo§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeo§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeo§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _     ;
define HarmRuleIgeoue §igeoue§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeoue§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeoue§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _     ;
define HarmRuleIgeou §igeou§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeou§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeou§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _     ;
define HarmRuleIgeoe §igeoe§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeoe§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeoe§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _     ;
define HarmRuleIgeo2 §igeo2§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ?*  ,,
                    §igeo2§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeo2§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ;
define HarmRuleIgeo3 §igeo3§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeo3§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _    ,,
                    §igeo3§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _     ;

define HarmRuleIgeu §igeu§ -> u // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                    §igeu§ -> ü // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleIgeuo §igeuo§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                    §igeuo§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;

define HarmRuleIgea §igea§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ?*  ,,
                    §igea§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _  ?*  ;

define HarmRuleIgeaa §igeaa§ -> é // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _   ?*  ,,
                    §igeaa§ -> á // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _  ?*  ;
